Utah statutes.
54-12-3.   Recovery of investment costs.

The commission may not consider any purchasing utility's purchase of power from a qualifying power producer as a reason for disallowing recovery of the purchasing utility's investment costs for facilities which are in use prior to signing a contract for the purchase of power from a qualifying power producer.



Amended by Chapter 374, 2008 General Session

